Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1114
Unlawful representation concerning merits of registration or exemption.

Neither the fact that an application for registration or notice filing under section 8-1103, a notice filing under section 8-1108.02, or a registration statement under section 8-1105, 8-1106, or 8-1107 has been filed, nor the fact that a person or security is effectively registered, shall constitute a finding by the director that any document filed under the Securities Act of Nebraska is true, complete, and not misleading. Neither any such fact nor the fact that an exemption or exception is available for a security or a transaction shall mean that the director has passed in any way upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, any person, security, or transaction. It shall be unlawful to make, or cause to be made, to any prospective purchaser, customer, or client any representation inconsistent with this section.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 14, p. 1790;

Laws 1997, LB 335, § 8.